Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1205
Certification; forfeiture or cancellation; when.

(1) If a program participant obtains a name change, he or she shall forfeit his or her certification as a program participant unless the program participant applies to the Secretary of State for recertification and provides documentation of the legal name change.

(2) The Secretary of State may cancel a program participant's certification if there is a change in the mailing address from the one listed on the application under section 42-1204, unless the program participant provides the Secretary of State with notice of the change of address in such manner as is provided by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of State.

(3) The Secretary of State may cancel certification of a program participant if mail forwarded to the program participant's address is returned as undeliverable.

(4) The Secretary of State shall cancel certification of a program participant who applies using false information.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 5.